Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.360

Acquisition of control of association—Unlawful, when—Application—Contents—Notice to other associations—Penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for any acquiring party to acquire control of an association until thirty days after the date of filing with the director an application containing substantially all of the following information and any additional information that the director may prescribe as necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of deposit account holders, borrowers or stockholders:

(a) The identity, character, and experience of each acquiring party by whom or on whose behalf acquisition is to be made;

(b) The financial and managerial resources and future prospects of each acquiring party involved in the acquisition;

(c) The terms and conditions of any proposed acquisition and the manner in which such acquisition is to be made;

(d) The source and amount of the funds or other consideration used or to be used in making the acquisition and, if any part of these funds or other consideration has been or is to be borrowed or otherwise obtained for the purpose of making the acquisition, a description of the transaction and the names of the parties. However, where a source of funds is a loan made in the lender's ordinary course of business, if the person filing the statement so requests, the director shall not disclose the name of the lender to the public;

(e) Any plans or proposals which any acquiring party making the acquisition may have to liquidate the association to sell its assets, to merge it with any company, or to make any other major changes in its business or corporate structure or management;

(f) The identification of any persons employed, retained or to be compensated by the acquiring party, or by any person on his or her behalf, who makes solicitations or recommendations to stockholders for the purpose of assisting in the acquisition, and brief description of the terms of such employment, retainer, or arrangements for compensation;

(g) Copies of all invitations for tenders or advertisements making a tender offer to stockholders for purchase of their stock to be used in connection with the proposed acquisition.

(2) When an unincorporated company is required to file the statements under subsection (1)(a), (b), and (f) of this section, the director may require that the information be given with respect to each partner of a partnership or limited partnership, by each member of a syndicate or group, and by each person who controls a partner or member. When an incorporated company is required to file the statements under subsection (1)(a), (b), and (f) of this section, the director may require that the information be given for the corporation and for each officer and director of the corporation and for each person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of the corporation. If any tender offer, request or invitation for tenders or other agreement to acquire control is proposed to be made by means of a registration statement under the federal securities act of 1933 (48 Stat. 74, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 77a), as amended, or in circumstances requiring the disclosure of similar information under the federal securities exchange act of 1934 (48 Stat. 881; 15 U.S.C. Sec. 77b), as amended, or in an application filed with the federal home loan bank board requiring similar disclosure, such registration statement or application may be filed with the director in lieu of the requirements of this section.

(3) The director shall give notice by mail to all associations doing business within the state of the filing of an application to acquire control of an association. The association shall transmit a check to the director for two hundred dollars when filing the application to cover the expense of notification. Persons interested in protesting the application may contact the director in person or by writing prior to a date which shall be given in the notice.

(4) Any person who willfully violates this section, or any regulation or order thereunder, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars for each day during which the violation continues.

[ 2003 c 53 s 197; 1994 c 92 s 447; 1982 c 3 s 54; 1979 c 113 s 13; 1973 c 130 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1979 c 113: See note following RCW 33.04.020.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.